Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6040
Department; approve programs and materials.

The department shall approve all courses, lectures, seminars, course materials, or other instructional programs used to meet the requirements of sections 71-6038 to 71-6042.

Laws 1983, LB 273, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 750;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 112;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1237.